Maine, session 132, LD749.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §391, sub-§1, as corrected by RR 2019, c. 2, Pt. B, §50, is
amended to read:
1. Interim appointment. Within a reasonable time after the vacancy occurs, the
Governor shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy until that person's successor
is elected and qualified. If the person who vacated the office was enrolled in a political
party at the time of that person's last election to that office, the qualified person appointed
to fill the vacancy must have been enrolled in that party at the time of the most recent
election and at the time the office was vacated and must be enrolled in that party at the time
the qualified person is appointed. If the person who vacated the office was not enrolled in
a political party at the time of that person's last election to that office, the qualified person
appointed to fill the vacancy may not have been enrolled in a political party at the time of
the most recent election and at the time the office was vacated and may not be enrolled in
a political party at the time the qualified person is appointed.